Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-424.01
PACE center, defined.

PACE center means a facility from which a PACE provider offers services within the scope of a PACE program pursuant to a written agreement between the provider, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and the Nebraska Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 10.